Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-152
Flat rates authorized.

The commission may order that flat rate service shall be available whenever measured service is implemented and that for such service the price restrictions prescribed in the Nebraska Telecommunications Regulation Act shall be retained. Measured service means basic local exchange service, the rate for which is a combination of a flat rate access line charge plus usage charges which may be based upon number of calls, length of calls, distance of calls, and time of day.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 51.